Utah statutes.
76-2-205.   Criminal responsibility of person for conduct in name of corporation or association.

A person is criminally liable for conduct constituting an offense which he performs or causes to be performed in the name of or on behalf of a corporation or association to the same extent as if such conduct were performed in his own name or behalf.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

